Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 10.1 Collateralization of Public Deposits

35-10.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Collateralization of Public Deposits Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 74, § 1.

35-10.1-2.
Definitions.

The following definitions shall apply for the purposes of this chapter:

“Commission” shall mean the state investment commission established pursuant to chapter 10 of this title.

“Depository institution” shall mean any state chartered bank or trust company, state chartered loan and investment company or building loan company, national banking association, state chartered savings bank, or federally chartered savings bank insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or a federally or state chartered credit union insured by the national credit union administration.

“Eligible collateral” shall mean assets owned by a depository institution free and clear of any right, title, or interest of any other party (other than a public depositor that acquires a security interest in the collateral) pursuant to this chapter and consisting of:

Obligations of the United States government or any of its agencies or instrumentalities;

Obligations of the state or any of its political subdivisions, or of any of the agencies, boards, or commissions of the state or political subdivision;

Obligations of any state other than Rhode Island or any of that other state’s political subdivisions, or any of the agencies, boards, or commissions of that state or political subdivision, provided that these obligations are rated not less than “A” by standard & poor’s corporation or moody’s investors service;

One to four (4) family residential mortgage loans; provided, that the value of the collateral is not less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the public deposit secured thereby; and provided, further, that the original loan to value ratio on the individual mortgage loans pledged as collateral shall not have exceeded eighty percent (80%) unless private mortgage insurance was obtained with respect to any excess; however, collateral of this type shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of total collateral pledged by a depository institution; or

Other marketable securities and debt instruments determined by the commission to be satisfactory for purposes of providing liquid assets in the event of the default or insolvency of a qualified depository institution; provided, that the commission gives prompt public notice of any determination it makes under this paragraph; and provided, further, that all depository institutions are permitted to use any category of eligible collateral approved under this section; however, collateral of this type shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of total collateral pledged by a depository institution.

“Public deposit” shall mean funds deposited in a demand account or time deposit account at any depository institution by the state or any of its agencies, boards, or commissions, or by any governmental subdivision of the state or any of the subdivision’s agencies, boards, commissions, or districts.

“Public depositor” shall mean the entity in the name of which a public deposit is maintained.

“Qualified depository institution” shall mean a depository institution that has satisfied all of the requirements of this chapter with respect to insuring or securing public deposits held by that institution.

“State” shall mean the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 74, § 1.

35-10.1-3.
Securing of deposits.

Every qualified public depository shall, at a minimum insure or pledge eligible collateral equal to one hundred percent (100%) of public deposits which are time deposits with maturities greater than sixty (60) days, and which were maintained with that depository institution as of October 1, 1991; provided, that any qualified depository institution which does not meet its minimum capital standard as prescribed by its federal regulator shall insure or pledge eligible collateral equal to one hundred percent (100%) of all public deposits maintained with that depository institution as of October 1, 1991. The amount of eligible collateral required shall be determined when funds are deposited for time deposits, and at the end of each month for demand deposits. The amount of required insurance shall be determined in accordance with §

35-10.1-8

.

All eligible collateral shall be designated as security for public deposits under this chapter and shall be segregated from the depository institution’s other assets, by:

Depositing the collateral in a custodial account at the federal reserve bank or federal home loan bank for the district in which the qualified depository institution is located;

Depositing the collateral in a custodial account in the qualified depository institution’s trust department or in the trust department of another qualified depository institution; provided, that the terms under which the collateral is to be held are set forth in a written custodial agreement; and provided, further, that no creditor of the depository institution that pledged the collateral may have or obtain rights in the collateral that are superior to the rights of the public depositor; or

When the collateral is held in book entry form, notifying the custodian of the collateral that it has been pledged as collateral for a public deposit.

If eligible collateral has been designated and segregated as provided in this section, the public depositor shall be deemed to have a perfected security interest therein.

The qualified depository institution shall deliver to the general treasurer, municipal finance officer, or chief financial officer a power of attorney authorizing the general treasurer, municipal finance officer, or chief financial officer to transfer or liquidate these securities in the event of default, financial failure, or insolvency of a depository institution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 74, § 1.

35-10.1-4.
Substitution of collateral.

A qualified depository institution may substitute insurance or different forms of collateral from time to time without notice to the public depositor or the commission; provided, that any substitute collateral constitutes eligible collateral; and provided, further, that no substitution of insurance or collateral shall cause the depository institution to cease being a qualified depository institution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 74, § 1.

35-10.1-5.
Valuation of collateral.

The valuation of collateral shall be established initially at the time the collateral is pledged and shall be adjusted thereafter as of the last day of each month. For the purpose of this chapter, the value of collateral shall be its market value.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 74, § 1.

35-10.1-6.
Income from collateral.

The income from assets that constitute segregated collateral shall belong without restriction to the depository institution that pledged the collateral unless and until the assets are transferred to the public depositor or its designee as the result of a default or insolvency of the depository institution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 74, § 1.

35-10.1-7.
Reports.

Except with respect to those public deposits which are fully insured by federal deposit insurance, each qualified depository institution holding public deposits shall file a report as required by this section within forty-five (45) days following the end of each of the institution’s fiscal quarters.

Reports required to be filed under subsection (a) shall be certified as accurate by the chief financial officer of the reporting institution.

Reports required to be filed under subsection (a) shall be filed with the commission and with each public depositor that maintains a public deposit with the reporting institution.

Each quarterly report shall contain:

The name of the reporting institution and the name, title, address, and telephone number of an officer to whom questions regarding the report should be addressed;

The institution’s total capital as of the last day of the fiscal quarter most recently ended;

The institution’s risk based capital to risk weighted assets ratio as of the last day of the fiscal quarter most recently ended, computed in accordance with federal regulations applicable to the institution;

A statement whether or not the institution’s net income for the fiscal quarter most recently ended, as reported in a quarterly financial report certified by the institution’s chief financial officer, exceeded zero;

The aggregate dollar amount of public deposits held by the institution for each public depositor as of the last day of the fiscal quarter most recently ended;

The minimum dollar value of eligible collateral the institution is required to pledge in order to be a qualified depository institution in accordance with this chapter;

The value of all eligible collateral pledged by the institution, determined in accordance with this chapter; and

The amount of any private deposit insurance purchased by the institution with respect to its public deposits pursuant to §

35-10.1-8

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 74, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 213, § 1.

35-10.1-8.
Insurance.

At its option, a depository institution may elect to purchase insurance for one hundred percent (100%) of any public deposit not covered by federal deposit insurance or secured pursuant to this chapter; provided, that this insurance is provided by an insurer rated “AAA” by standard & poor’s corporation, moody’s investors service, or both. This insurance may be provided in lieu of, but shall not be required in addition to, collateral otherwise required pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 74, § 1.

35-10.1-9.
Federal deposit insurance.

Public deposits which are fully insured by federal deposit insurance, subject to deposit insurance limitations, shall not be required to be secured by eligible collateral as provided by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 74, § 1.

35-10.1-10.
Annual report.

An annual report shall be made sixty (60) days after the end of each calendar year by the general treasurer to the general assembly on the effectiveness of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 74, § 1.

35-10.1-11.
Effective date.

This chapter shall take effect June 7, 1991, and shall be applicable only to those deposits made subsequent to October 1, 1991.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 74, § 1.